Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-819
Bond issuance; other consent not required.

Bonds may be issued under the Interlocal Cooperation Act without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or instrumentality of this state and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required therefor by the Interlocal Cooperation Act, and the validity of and security for any bonds shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any such consent or other proceedings, conditions, or things.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 19.